Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 20. Internal Security and Public Safety

Executive Order No. 20-1
(No. 67-82) [Cadre of the Vermont State Guard.

WHEREAS, the Reserve Components of the military services, including the National Guard of the State of Vermont, are now considered to be the immediate back-up force of the Active Armed Forces; and

WHEREAS, on short notice, the National Guard of the State of Vermont could be deployed out of Vermont in order to back-up the Active Armed Forces; and

WHEREAS, once the Vermont National Guard has been mobilized and departs the state, the State of Vermont loses its effective back-up force for public safety and the security of the state; and

WHEREAS, in order to be duly prepared for an emergency situation,

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Richard A. Snelling, Governor of the State of Vermont, under and by virtue of the authority vested in me by the Constitution and the Laws of the State of Vermont, order as follows:

SEC. (1) The Cadre of the Vermont State Guard is organized.

SEC. (2) The Adjutant General of the State of Vermont is authorized and directed to take all appropriate steps to organize and maintain the formation of the Vermont State Guard Cadre in an inactive status without pay, to serve for an indefinite period
and until relieved by proper authority.

Dated April 26, 1982.

Executive Order No. 20-2
(No. 12-85) [Activation of Vermont National Guard for Assistance of Civilian Authorities in City of Barre.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 20-3
(No. 51-87) [Order Into Service of Vermont National Guardsmen for Assistance to Civilians and Authorities of State and Bennington County.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 20-4
(No. 58-88) [Veterans’ Advisory Council.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-46 (codified as Executive Order 06-05), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 20-5
(No. 77-89) [Declaration of State of Emergency and Activation of Emergency Disaster Preparedness Plan for Washington County.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 20-6
(No. 82-90) [Designation of Vermont State Police as State Clearinghouse for
Missing and Exploited Children.

WHEREAS, the Missing Children’s Assistance Act, passed by the United States Congress in 1984, established a National Center for Missing and Exploited Children; and

WHEREAS, the National Center is designed to help in establishing, maintaining and providing support information networks for state clearinghouses on missing and exploited children; and

WHEREAS, a state clearinghouse is necessary in order to maintain records, disseminate information on reported missing children and to assist local, state and federal agencies as well as family members on cases relating to missing and exploiting children;
and

WHEREAS, each state clearinghouse serves as a state based extension of the national effort to provide training, education, and public information relating to missing and exploited children; and

WHEREAS, the Vermont General Assembly by enactment of Title 20, chapter 112, has mandated that the Commissioner of the Department of Public Safety cooperate with and support all law enforcement agencies in matters relating to missing persons, and when
necessary in order to protect a missing person from harm, to coordinate all efforts to search for the missing person.

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Madeleine M. Kunin, by virtue of the powers vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby designate the Vermont State Police, Department of Public Safety, as the state clearinghouse for missing and exploited children.
The Vermont State Police shall contract with the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children and coordinate with other state clearinghouse agencies in order to receive and provide training, education, and public information
relating to missing and exploited children.

This Executive Order takes effect upon signing.

Dated January 12, 1990.

Executive Order No. 20-7
(No. 06-91) [Utilization of National Guard to Carry Out Vermont’s Drug Enforcement Support Plan.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 20-8
(No. 03-95) [Activation of National Guard to Assist Vermont State Police and the City of Burlington.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 20-9
(No. 04-95) [Declaration of State of Emergency for Caledonia, Chittenden, Essex, Lamoille, Orleans and Washington Counties.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 20-10
(No. 05-95) [Activation of National Guard to Assist State and Local Officials in Stabilizing Conditions Resulting From Flooding.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 20-11
(No. 08-96) [Declaration of State of Emergency and Activation of Emergency Disaster Preparedness Plan for State of Vermont.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 20-12
(No. 11-96) [Declaration of State of Emergency for Windham and Windsor Counties.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 20-13
(No. 12-96) [Activation of National Guard to Assist in Flood Recovery Operations in Windham County.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 20-14
(No. 01-97) [Declaration of State of Emergency for Franklin, Lamoille, and Orleans Counties.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 20-15
(No. 02-97) [Activation of National Guard to Assist in Flood Recovery Operations and Security in Franklin, Lamoille, and Orleans Counties.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 20-16
(No. 01-98) [Declaration of State of Emergency for Grand Isle County.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 20-17
(No. 02-98) [Activation of National Guard to Assist in Flood Recovery Operations and Security in Grand Isle County.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 20-18
(No. 03-98) [Declaration of State of Emergency for Chittenden, Franklin, and Addison Counties.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 20-19
(No. 04-98) [Activation of National Guard to Assist in Flood Recovery Operations and Security in Chittenden, Franklin, and Addison Counties.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 20-20
(No. 06-98) [Declaration of State of Emergency for Addison, Orange, Washington, and Windsor Counties.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 20-21
(No. 07-98) [Activation of National Guard to Assist in Flood Recovery Operations and Security in Addison, Orange, Washington, and Windsor Counties.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 20-22
(No. 08-99) [Declaration of State of Emergency and Activation of Emergency Disaster Preparedness Plan for Town of Springfield.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 20-23
(No. 09-99) [Activation of National Guard to Assist in Recovery Operations and Security in Town of Springfield.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 20-24
(No. 10-99) [Vermont National Guard Trust Fund.

WHEREAS, upon deactivation of the members of the Vermont Army National Guard after World War I, the company funds of various units comprising the First Infantry Regiment, Vermont National Guard, were turned over to the federal government, more specifically
the War Department (the forerunner of the Department of Defense);

WHEREAS, in 1927, the War Department returned the company funds to the Adjutant General for the Vermont Army National Guard, Brigadier General Herbert T. Johnson, to benefit the present and future elements of any reconstituted and/or reactivated regiment;

WHEREAS, in 1927, the Honorable John E. Weeks, Governor of the State of Vermont, by special order 54, dated 21 June 1927, created a special committee to review the receipt of these funds and to make recommendations;

WHEREAS, on 30 June 1927, upon the recommendation of the special committee, the Governor established the 172d Infantry Memorial Trust Fund;

WHEREAS, the 172d Infantry constituted the reorganized units of Vermont National Guard units that served in World War I;

WHEREAS, on 1 July 1960, the fund was redesignated by Executive Order (no number) of the Honorable Robert T. Stafford, Governor of the State of Vermont, as the “Vermont Army National Guard Memorial Trust Fund;”

WHEREAS, as of this date, the “Vermont Army National Guard Trust Fund” is still a functional fund but with the changes in the force structure over the last 40 years, there is a need to revise the fund.

NOW THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED, that I, Howard Dean, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor, do hereby reconstitute the “Vermont Army National Guard Memorial Trust Fund” as the “Vermont National Guard Trust Fund” (hereinafter referred to as the
“Trust”) and establish a Trust Fund Board with the duties and responsibilities as follows:

The Trust will be for the benefit of all members of the Vermont National Guard.

The Trust Fund Board will be chaired by the Adjutant General for the State of Vermont, and be comprised of the Deputy Adjutant General for the State of Vermont, the Vermont Army National Guard Assistant Adjutant General, and the Air National Guard Assistant
Adjutant General. A majority of the sitting members shall constitute a quorum and action taken by the board under the provisions of this Executive Order may be authorized by a majority of members present and voting at any regular
or special meeting. The members of the board will not receive any remuneration for their participation on the board except for the reimbursement of reasonable business expenses and/or operational costs.

The Trust Fund shall be administered by the board and effectuate the policies and purposes of this Executive Order. Deposits to the currently existing monies shall be made to the fund from moneys appropriated thereto by the general assembly from time
to time and from any other source, private or public, as approved by the board. Unexpended balances and any earnings shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the fund for use in accord with the purposes of this
Executive Order.

The original purpose of the Fund was to benefit the members of the Vermont National Guard in time of federal activation during an emergency and, in keeping with that purpose, the fund will continue to be used for members of the Vermont National Guard
in times of federal activation during emergencies, war, rebellion, humanitarian effort, operations other that war and in times of state active duty. The board will establish rules and regulations governing the expenditure of funds
under these conditions.

In further keeping with the original intent of the fund, the Board may disburse part of fund as a discretionary fund to be used for the purpose of the betterment of the members of the Vermont National Guard. But under no circumstance will this allocation
and disbursement reduce the total fund to an amount lower than $30,000, an amount to be used for the purposes stated in paragraph 4 above.

The Fund, principle and interest, will be invested and reinvested in commercially reasonable investment vehicles as approved by the Board.

If the Board deems necessary, the Board may contract with and/or hire investment consultants, brokers, counselors, or the like and the cost therefore, will be borne by the fund.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated October 8, 1999.

Executive Order No. 20-25
(No. 05-00) [Declaration of State of Emergency and Activation of Emergency-Disaster Preparedness Plan for Addison, Bennington, Windham and Windsor Counties.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 20-26
(No. 10-01) [Reconstitution of the Vermont Terrorism Task Force.

Superseded by Executive Order No. 01-03 (codified as Executive Order No. 20-29), dated February 20, 2003.

Executive Order No. 20-27
(No. 04-02) [Reestablishment of the Veterans Advisory Council.

Superseded by Executive Order No. 08-03 (codified as Executive Order No. 20-30), dated May 13, 2003.

Executive Order No. 20-28
(No. 05-02) [Declaration of State of Emergency for the County of Caledonia.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 20-29
(No. 01-03) [Governor’s Homeland Security Advisory Council.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 29-48 (codified as Executive Order No. 04-13), dated April 4, 2013.

Executive Order No. 20-30
(No. 08-03) [Governor’s Veterans Advisory Council.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 20-54 (codified as Executive Order No. 17-17), dated October 3, 2017.

Executive Order No. 20-31
(No. 03-05) [Designation Of The National Incident Management System (NIMS) As The Basis For All Incident Management In The State.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 07-12 (codified as Executive Order No. 20-45), dated April 12, 2012.

Executive Order No. 20-32
(No. 05-05) [Activation of National Guard to Assist in Hurricane Recovery Operations and Security in the State of Louisiana.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 20-33
(No. 02-06) [Vermont Communications Board.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 20-35 (codified as Executive Order No. 08-07), dated November 14, 2007.

Executive Order No. 20-34
(No. 04-07) [Declaration of State of Emergency and Activation of Emergency Operations Plan for State of Vermont.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 20-35
(No. 08-07) [Vermont Communications Board.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 04-08 (codified as Executive Order No. 20-36), dated October 28, 2008.

Executive Order No. 20-36
(No. 04-08) [Vermont Communications Board.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 20-44 (codified as Executive Order No. 02-12), dated January 17, 2012.

Executive Order No. 20-37
(No. 05-08) [Declaration of State of Emergency and Activation of Emergency Operations Plan for Bennington, Orange, Windham, and Windsor Counties.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-65 (codified as Executive Order 01-15), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 20-38
(No. 03-11) [Declaration of Emergency.

Pursuant to the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont under 20 V.S.A. Section 9, and as a result of excessive wind and rainfall combined with water runoff and resulting damages which occurred beginning April 23, 2011 and considered ongoing at
this time, I hereby declare a State of Emergency for the State of Vermont.

I further order and direct the activation of the Vermont State Emergency Operations Plan and authorize the use of state resources to alleviate hardship and suffering of citizens and communities impacted by the emergency event.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated May 5, 2011.

ADDENDUM TO EXECUTIVE ORDER No. 03-11 :x60

Pursuant to

20 V.S.A. § 13
, I, Peter Shumlin, hereby proclaim that the state of emergency declared in Executive Order #03-11, dated May 5, 2011, has terminated effective June 6, 2011 at 11:59 PM.

Dated June 8, 2011.

Executive Order No. 20-39
(No. 04-11) [Champlain Flooding Guard Call-Out.

WHEREAS, on May 5, 2011, there exists an emergency within the State, to wit, flooding along the shores of Lake Champlain affecting Grand Isle, Franklin, Chittenden, and Addison Counties.

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Peter Shumlin, Governor of the State of Vermont, under and by virtue of the Authority vested in me by the Constitution and laws of the State of Vermont, including Chapter II, Section 20, of the Constitution of the State of Vermont,
and Title

20 V.S.A. §§ 601
and 603, hereby order as follows:

SEC. (1) The National Guard of the State of Vermont is called out.

SEC. (2) The Adjutant General of the State of Vermont is authorized and directed to take all appropriate steps to alleviate hardship and suffering of citizens and communities in Vermont that are impacted by flooding.

SEC. (3) In furtherance of the authorization and direction contained in SEC. (2) hereof, the Adjutant General is authorized to use such of the National Guard of the State of Vermont as he may deem necessary.

SEC. (4) I HEREBY AUTHORIZE AND DIRECT THE Adjutant General to call into Active State Service, as he may deem appropriate to carry out the purpose of this Order, any and all units of the National Guard of the State of Vermont to serve for an indefinite
period and until relieved by proper authority.

Dated May 5, 2011.

ADDENDUM TO EXECUTIVE ORDER No. 04-11 :x60

WHEREAS, pursuant to Executive Order 04-11, the National Guard of the State of Vermont has provided services in support of the emergency management operations of the State of Vermont in connection with the State of Emergency declared in Executive Order
No. 03-11; and

WHEREAS, by addendum to Executive Order No. 03-11, June 8, 2011, that state of emergency terminated effective June 6, 2011 at 11:59 p.m.;

NOW THEREFORE I, Peter Shumlin, hereby terminate the call-out of the Vermont National Guard and the provisions of Executive Order No. 04-11, effective June 6, 2011, at 11:59 p.m.

Dated June 14, 2011.

Executive Order No. 20-40
(No. 06-11) [Barre Flooding Guard Call-Out.

WHEREAS, on May 27, 2011, there exists an emergency within the State, to wit: wide spread flooding throughout the State of Vermont, to include but not limited to the following counties: Washington, Orange, Essex, Lamoille, Caledonia, Rutland, Orleans
and Chittenden.

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Peter Shumlin, Governor of the State of Vermont, under and by virtue of the Authority vested in me by the Constitution of Laws of the State of Vermont, including Chapter II, Section 20, of the Constitution of the State of Vermont, and
Title

20 V.S.A. §§ 601
and 603, do hereby order as follows:

SEC. (1) The National Guard of the State of Vermont is called out.

SEC. (2) The Adjutant General of the State of Vermont is authorized and directed to take all appropriate steps to alleviate hardship and suffering of citizens and communities in Vermont that are impacted by flooding.

SEC. (3) In furtherance of the authorization and direction contained in SEC. (2) hereof, the Adjutant General is authorized to use such of the National Guard of the State of Vermont as he may deem necessary.

SEC. (4) I hereby authorize and direct the Adjutant General to call into Active State Service, as he may deem appropriate to carry out the purpose of this Order, any and all units of the National Guard of the State of Vermont to serve for an indefinite
period and until relieved by proper authority.

Dated May 27, 2011.

ADDENDUM TO EXECUTIVE ORDER No. 06-11 :x60

WHEREAS, pursuant to Executive Order 06-11, the National Guard of the State of Vermont has provided services in support of the emergency management operations of the State of Vermont in connection with the State of Emergency declared in Executive Order
No. 03-11; and

WHEREAS, by addendum to Executive Order No. 03-11, June 8, 2011, that state of emergency terminated effective June 6, 2011 at 11:59 p.m.;

NOW THEREFORE I, Peter Shumlin, hereby terminate the call-out of the Vermont National Guard and the provisions of Executive Order No. 06-11, effective June 6, 2011, at 11:59 p.m.

Dated June 14, 2011.

Executive Order No. 20-41
(No. 11-11) [State of Emergency, Call-Out of Guard.

As of August 27, 2011, a state of emergency exists within the State. In particular, Vermont faces the imminent likelihood of extremely high winds, excessive rain and flooding from Hurricane Irene and related storms, with the likelihood of widespread damage.
The State of Vermont, through its various agencies, is taking steps to prepare for the anticipated storm.

Accordingly, I, Peter Shumlin, pursuant to the authority vested in me by the Vermont Constitution, Chapter II, Section 20 and 20 V.S.A. sections 9, 601 and 603, do hereby order as follows:

I declare a state of emergency for the State of Vermont;

I hereby call out the National Guard of the State of Vermont;

I authorize and direct the Adjutant General of the State of Vermont to take all appropriate steps to alleviate hardship and suffering of citizens and communities throughout Vermont that are impacted by the hurricane and associated storms;

I hereby authorize and direct the Adjutant General to call into Active State Service, as he may deem appropriate to carry out the purpose of this Order, any and all units of the National Guard of the State of Vermont to serve for an indefinite period
and until relieved by proper authority.

Dated August 27, 2011.

ADDENDUM TO EXECUTIVE ORDER No. 11-11 :x60

[Terminating Guard Call-Out]

WHEREAS, pursuant to Executive Order No. 11-11, the National Guard of the State of Vermont has provided services in support of the emergency management operations of the State of Vermont in connection with the State of Emergency declared in Executive
Order No. 11-11 incident to Tropical Storm Irene; and

WHEREAS, the National Guard of the State of Vermont, having served ably and with distinction in Vermont’s time of extraordinary need, has completed its mission;

NOW THEREFORE I, Peter Shumlin, hereby terminate the call-out of the Vermont National Guard and the provisions of Executive Order No. 11-11 relative thereto effective this 23rd day of November, 2011.

Dated November 23, 2011.

Executive Order No. 20-42
(No. 17-11) [Vermont Military Humanitarian Service Medal.

I, Peter Shumlin, Governor of the State of Vermont, under and by virtue of the Authority vested in me by the Constitution and Laws of the State of Vermont, do order as follows:

SEC. (1) There is hereby established a

Vermont Military Humanitarian Service Medal
with accompanying ribbons and appurtenances for award by the Adjutant General. Individuals eligible for the medal are members of the Vermont National Guard and the Vermont State Guard when in active service, who, subsequent
to August 27, 2011, distinguished themselves by meritorious participation in a military act or operation of a humanitarian nature. The Adjutant General will determine types of acts or operations that warrant award of the medal.

SEC. (2) The

Vermont Military Humanitarian Service Medal
and ribbons and appurtenances thereto shall be of appropriate design approved by the Adjutant General and shall be awarded by the Adjutant General under uniform regulations, as prescribed by the Adjutant General.

SEC. (3) No more than one

Vermont Military Humanitarian Service Medal
shall be awarded to any one person, but for each subsequent participation in a humanitarian act or operation justifying such an award, a suitable device may be awarded to be worn with that medal as prescribed by appropriate
regulations of the Vermont National Guard.

SEC. (4) The

Vermont Military Humanitarian Service Medal
or device may be awarded posthumously, and when so awarded, may be presented to such representative of the deceased as may be deemed appropriate by the Adjutant General.

Dated November 23, 2011.

Executive Order No. 20-43
(No. 18-11) [Vermont National Guard Civilian Humanitarian Service Medal.

I, Peter Shumlin, Governor of the State of Vermont, under and by virtue of the Authority vested in me by the Constitution and Laws of the State of Vermont, do order as follows:

SEC. (1) There is hereby established a

Vermont National Guard Civilian Humanitarian Service Medal
with accompanying ribbons and appurtenances for award by the Adjutant General. Those eligible for the medal are individuals, government employees, organizations, corporations, associations and other groups that have made
a substantial contribution to the Vermont National Guard, and subsequent to August 27, 2011, have distinguished themselves by meritorious participation and support to a military act or operation of a humanitarian nature. The Adjutant
General will determine types of acts or operations that warrant award of the medal.

SEC. (2) The

Vermont National Guard Civilian Humanitarian Service Medal
and ribbons and appurtenances thereto shall be of appropriate design approved by the Adjutant General and shall be awarded by the Adjutant General under uniform regulations, as prescribed by the Adjutant General.

SEC. (3) No more than one

Vermont National Guard Civilian Humanitarian Service Medal
shall be awarded to any one individual, but for each subsequent participation in a humanitarian act or operation justifying such an award, a suitable device may be awarded to be worn with that medal as prescribed by appropriate
regulations of the Vermont National Guard.

SEC. (4) The

Vermont National Guard Civilian Humanitarian Service Medal
or device may be awarded posthumously, and when so awarded, may be presented to such representative of the deceased as may be deemed appropriate by the Adjutant General.

Dated November 23, 2011.

Executive Order No. 20-44
(No. 02-12) [Vermont Communications Board.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 20-57 (codified as Executive Order No. 05-19), dated July 9, 2019.

Executive Order No. 20-45
(No. 07-12) [Designation of The National Incident Management System (NIMS) as the Basis for all Incident Management in the State.

WHEREAS, Homeland Security Directive (HSPD)-5 directed the Secretary of the Department of Homeland Security to develop and administer a National Incident Management System (NIMS) to provide a consistent nationwide approach for Federal, State, local, and
tribal governments to work together to prevent, prepare for, respond to and recover from domestic incidents, regardless of cause, size or complexity; and

WHEREAS, Presidential Policy Directive (PPD)-8 describes the approach to national preparedness, including the National Preparedness System, as the instrument the nation will employ to build, sustain, and deliver core capabilities; and

WHEREAS, the NIMS standardized procedures for managing personnel, communications, facilities and resources improve the State’s ability to utilize federal funding to enhance local and state agency readiness, maintain first responder safety, and streamline
incident management processes; and

WHEREAS, the Incident Command System components of NIMS are integral to various incident management activities, including emergency management training programs.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Peter Shumlin, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor, do hereby re-establish the National Incident Management System (NIMS) as the State standard for incident management.

This Order supersedes and replaces Executive Order # 03-05 (codified as No. 20-31).

Dated April 12, 2012.

Executive Order No. 20-46
(No. 11-12) [Declaration of State of Emergency — Storm Sandy.

As of October 28, 2012, a state of emergency exists within the State due to Storm Sandy. The State of Vermont, through its various agencies, is taking steps to prepare for the anticipated storm.

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Peter Shumlin, pursuant to the authority vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont by the Vermont Constitution, Chapter II, § 20 and

20 V.S.A. §§ 8
, 9 do hereby declare a state of emergency for the State of Vermont. I further order and direct activation of the Vermont State Emergency Operations Plan and authorize the use of state resources to protect the public
and to alleviate hardship and suffering of citizens and communities impacted by the emergency event.

ADDENDUM TO EXECUTIVE ORDER No.
11-12 :x60

Pursuant to

20 V.S.A. § 13
, I, Peter Shumlin, pursuant to the authority vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, hereby proclaim that the state of emergency declared in Executive Order No. 11-12, dated October 29, 2012, has terminated
effective November 9, 2012 at 12:00 PM.

Dated November 9, 2012.

Executive Order No. 20-47
(No. 13-12) [Vermont National Guard Trust Fund Board.

WHEREAS, upon deactivation of members of the Vermont Army National Guard after World War I, the company funds of units comprising the First Infantry Regiment, Vermont National Guard, were turned over to the federal War Department (now the Department of
Defense); and

WHEREAS, in 1927, the War Department returned the company funds to the Adjutant General for the Vermont Army National Guard, Brigadier General Herbert T. Johnson, to benefit the present and future elements of any reconstituted and/or reactivated regiment;
and

WHEREAS, in 1927, Governor John E. Weeks, by special order 54, dated June 21, 1927, created a special committee to review the receipt of these funds and to make recommendations; and

WHEREAS, on June 30, 1927, upon the recommendation of the special committee, the Governor established the 172d Infantry Memorial Trust Fund — the 172d Infantry being the reorganized units of Vermont National Guard units that served in World War I; and

WHEREAS, on July 1, 1960, the fund was re-designated by Executive Order (no number) of Governor Robert T. Stafford as the “Vermont Army National Guard Memorial Trust Fund”; and

WHEREAS, on October 8, 1999, Governor Howard Dean reconstituted the fund as the “Vermont National Guard Trust Fund” and established the Trust Fund Board;

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Peter Shumlin, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor, do hereby amend the duties and responsibilities of the Trust Fund Board as follows:

Composition, Appointments, and Process

The Trust Fund Board shall be chaired by the Adjutant General for the State of Vermont, or his/her designee. The Adjutant General shall appoint members to the Board and shall appoint not less than three members. A majority of the sitting members shall
constitute a quorum and action taken by the Board under this Executive Order may be authorized by a majority of members present and voting at any regular or special meeting. The members of the board will not receive any remuneration
by the State of Vermont for their participation on the Board.

Charge

The Board shall administer the Trust Fund and effectuate the policies and purposes of this Executive Order. Deposits to the currently existing monies shall be made to the Fund from moneys appropriated thereto by the General Assembly from time to time
and from any other source, private or public, as approved by the Board. Unexpended balances and any earnings shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the fund for use in accord with the purposes of this Executive
Order.

The Trust will be for the benefit of all members of the Vermont National Guard.

The original purpose of the Fund was to benefit members of the Vermont National Guard in times of federal activation during an emergency and, in keeping with that purpose, the Fund will continue to be used for members of the Vermont National Guard in
times of federal activation during emergencies, war, rebellion, humanitarian effort, operations other that war and in times of state active duty. The Board will establish rules and regulations governing the expenditure of funds
under these conditions.

In further keeping with the original intent of the Fund, the Board may disburse part of the Fund as a discretionary fund for the purpose of betterment of the members of the Vermont National Guard. Under no circumstance will this allocation and disbursement
reduce the total Fund to an amount lower than $30,000, to be used for the purposes stated in the preceding paragraph.

The Fund, principle and interest, will be invested and reinvested in commercially reasonable investment vehicles as approved by the Board.

If the Board deems necessary, the Board may contract with and/or hire investment consultants, brokers, counselors, or the like and the cost therefore, will be borne by the Fund.

Effective Date

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until further order by the Governor.

Dated November 8, 2012.

Executive Order No. 20-48
(No. 04-13) [Governor’s Emergency Preparedness Advisory Council.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 20-58.

Executive Order No. 20-49
(No. 05-13) [Public Safety Broadband Network Commission.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 20-57 (codified as Executive Order No. 05-19), dated July 9, 2019.

Executive Order No. 20-50
(No. 05-15) [State of Emergency in Washington County, Call-Out of Guard.

As of July 19, 2015, a state of emergency exists within Washington County due to excessive rainfall. In particular, the town of Barre, located in Washington County, is experiencing severe flooding due to unusually heavy rain and thunderstorms, with the
likelihood of significant damage.

Accordingly, I, Peter Shumlin, pursuant to the authority vested in me by the Vermont Constitution, Chapter II, § 20 and

20 V.S.A. §§ 9
, 601, and 603, do hereby order as follows:

I declare a state of emergency for Washington County;

I hereby call out the National Guard of the State of Vermont;

I authorize and direct the Adjutant General of the State of Vermont to take all appropriate steps to alleviate hardship and suffering of citizens and communities throughout Washington County that are impacted by the recent storms and flooding;

I hereby authorize and direct the Adjutant General to call into Active State Service, as he may deem appropriate to carry out the purpose of this Order, any and all units of the National Guard of the State of Vermont to serve for an indefinite period
and until relieved by proper authority; and

I further order and direct activation of the Vermont State Emergency Operations Plan and authorize the use of state resources to protect the public and to alleviate hardship and suffering of citizens and communities impacted by the emergency event.

Dated July 20, 2015

Executive Order No. 20-51
(No. 10-17) [Activation of Vermont National Guard for Special Duty.

Pursuant to the authority vested in me as Governor of Vermont and Commander-in-Chief, Vermont National Guard by the Constitution of Laws of the State of Vermont, Chapter II, Section 20, and

20 V.S.A. § 601
, 603 and 366, and having determined that the necessity of public service requires it, hereby order and direct the Adjutant General of Vermont to order into service, as he may deem appropriate to carry out the purpose
of this Order, any and all units of the National Guard of the State of Vermont for the performance of special duty for the purpose of responding to and providing support for a recovery mission at Mt. Pisgah in Westmore, Vermont.

The Adjutant General of the State of Vermont is authorized and directed to take all appropriate steps to assist in the performance of this special duty.

Payment for personnel performing the State service shall be in accordance with the provisions of

20 V.S.A. § 603
.

This Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated May 17, 2017.

ADDENDUM TO EXECUTIVE ORDER No. 10-17

WHEREAS, pursuant to Executive Order 10-17, the Vermont National Guard has provided special duty services for the purpose of responding to and providing support for a recovery mission at Mt. Pisgah in Westmore, Vermont.

WHEREAS, the recovery mission has been successfully completed effective May 19, 2017.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, hereby terminate the call-out of the Vermont National Guard and the provisions of Executive Order No. 10-17, effective May 20, 2017 at 00:01.

Dated May 31, 2017.

Executive Order No. 20-52
(No. 14-17) [Activation of Vermont National Guard in the Aftermath of Tropical System Harvey in the State of Texas.

Pursuant to the authority vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont and Commander-in-Chief, Vermont National Guard by the Constitution of Laws of the State of Vermont, Chapter II, Section 20, and pursuant to a request from the Governor of Texas
pursuant to the Emergency Management Assistance Compact, 20 V.S.A. Ch. 4, for the provision of aid and assistance in the aftermath of the Tropical System Harvey declared disaster, I hereby order into service four (4) personnel of the
National Guard for the purpose of providing crucial public affairs support to the Defense Support to Civilians mission and conduct media operations. These assets will bolster public affairs capabilities as the mission continues to
transition into logistics distribution and long-term life support of affected areas in the Joint Operations Area in the State of Texas.

This Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated September 5, 2017.